Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-5-131 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The intentional injection, release, or dispersion, by any means,
of chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus within
the borders of this state into the atmosphere with the express
purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or the intensity of the
sunlight is prohibited.
SECTION 2. REPEALER 82 O.S. 2021, Sections 1087.1,
1087.2, 1087.3, 1087.4, 1087.5, 1087.6, 1087.7, 1087.8, 1087.9,
Req. No. 10148 Page 1

1087 .10, 1087.11, 1087.12, 1087.13, 1087.14, 1087.15, 1087.16,
1087.17, 1087.18, 1087.19, 1087.20, 1801.1, 1801.2, 1801.3, and
1801.4 are hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10148 JBH 12/20/24















Req. No. 10148 Page 2